Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.190

Transfer of membership authorized.

Any firefighter as defined in RCW 41.18.010 who has prior to July 1, 1969 been employed as a member of a fire department and who desires to make contributions and avail himself or herself of the pension and other benefits of chapter 41.18 RCW as now law or hereafter amended, may transfer his or her membership from any other pension fund, except the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, to the pension fund provided in chapter 41.18 RCW: PROVIDED, That such firefighter transmits written notice of his or her intent to transfer to the pension board of his or her municipality prior to September 1, 1969.

[ 2007 c 218 s 60; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 41.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.

Effective date—Severability—Construction—1969 ex.s. c 209: See RCW 41.26.3901, 41.26.3902, and 41.26.3903.

Law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system: Chapter 41.26 RCW.